Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-3303
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act:

(1) Board means the board of commissioners of an inland port authority;

(2) City means any city of the metropolitan class, city of the primary class, or city of the first class which contains an area eligible to be designated as an inland port district;

(3) Direct financial benefit means any form of financial benefit that accrues to an individual directly, including compensation, commission, or any other form of a payment or increase of money, or an increase in the value of a business or property. Direct financial benefit does not include a financial benefit that accrues to the public generally;

(4) Family member means a spouse, parent, sibling, child, or grandchild;

(5) Inland port authority means an authority created by a city, a county, or a city and one or more counties under the Municipal Inland Port Authority Act to manage an inland port district;

(6) Inland port district means an area within the corporate boundaries or extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction or both of a city, within the boundaries of one or more counties, or within both the corporate boundaries or extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction or both of a city and the boundaries of one or more counties, and which meets at least two of the following criteria:

(a) Is located within one mile of a navigable river or other navigable waterway;

(b) Is located within one mile of a major rail line;

(c) Is located within two miles of any portion of the federally designated National System of Interstate and Defense Highways or any other four-lane divided highway; or

(d) Is located within two miles of a major airport;

(7)(a) Innovation district means a geographic area where leading-edge institutions, companies, and industry clusters connect with startup businesses, business incubators, research institutions, and accelerators, and that is physically compact, transit-accessible, and technically wired with mixed-use housing, office, retail, and light industrial space.

(b) Innovation districts include, but are not limited to, the following:

(i) The anchor-plus model, primarily found in the downtowns and midtowns of central cities, where large-scale mixed-use development is centered around major anchor institutions and a rich base of related firms, entrepreneurs, and spin-off companies involved in the commercialization of innovation;

(ii) The re-imagined urban areas model, often found near or along historic waterfronts, where industrial or warehouse districts are undergoing a physical and economic transformation. Such change is powered in part by transit access, a historic building stock, and proximity to downtowns in high-rent cities which is supplemented with advanced research institutions and anchor companies; and

(iii) The urbanized science park model, commonly found in suburban and exurban areas, where traditionally isolated, sprawling areas of innovation are urbanizing through increased density and an infusion of new activities, including retail and restaurants, that are mixed as opposed to separated;

(8) Innovation hub has the same meaning as in section 81-12,108;

(9) Intermodal facility means a hub or other facility for trade combining any combination of rail, barge, trucking, air cargo, or other transportation services;

(10) Major airport means an airport with commercial service as defined by the Federal Aviation Administration;

(11) Major rail line means a rail line that is accessible to a Class I railroad as defined by the federal Surface Transportation Board; and

(12) Nonprofit economic development corporation means a chamber of commerce or other mutual benefit or public benefit corporation organized under the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act to assist economic development.

Laws 2021, LB156, § 3;

Laws 2022, LB998, § 2;

Laws 2024, LB164, § 3.

Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, see section 21-1901.